Massachusetts, session 194th, H580.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
(a) Teachers employed in a public elementary or secondary school as substitute teachers 
shall not be paid less per day than either 85 per cent of 1/185 th of the salary of a beginning 
teacher who holds a bachelor's degree or a wage less than the per hour wage set forth in section 1 
of chapter 151, whichever is greater. The salary of the substitute teacher shall be computed as 
required in this subsection based on the statewide average salary for beginning teachers who hold 
bachelor's degrees. The department of elementary and secondary education shall compute the 
statewide average salary to be used for purposes of this subsection, using the latest data available 
to the department, but not data from earlier than the preceding school year. 
(b) This section shall not apply to substitute teachers represented in a bargaining unit in 
the school district by which they are employed.